District of Columbia statutes.
8-1803

Vaccinations.

(a)

An owner who has a dog over the age of 4 months shall have the dog vaccinated against rabies and distemper. Pursuant to rules issued by the Mayor, an owner of a cat over the age of 4 months shall have that cat vaccinated against rabies.

(b)

The Mayor shall provide a free anti-rabies vaccination clinic annually.

Oct. 18, 1979, D.C. Law 3-30, § 4, 26 DCR 765
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-199, § 4(a), 30 DCR 119
1981 Ed., § 6-1003.
1973 Ed., § 6-2403.
Delegation of authority under Law 3-30, see Mayor’s Order 83-206, August 2, 1983.